North Carolina, session 2025, SB759.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 90-21.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-21.4. Responsibility, liability and immunity of physicians.
(a) Any physician licensed to practice medicine in North Carolina providing health
services to a minor under the terms, conditions and circumstances of this Article shall not be held
liable in any civil or criminal action for providing such services without having obtained
permission from the minor's parent, legal guardian, person standing in loco parentis, or a legal
custodian other than a parent when granted specific authority in a custody order to consent to
medical or psychiatric treatment. The physician shall not be relieved on the basis of this Article
from liability for negligence in the diagnosis and treatment of a minor.
(b) The physician shall not notify a parent, legal guardian, person standing in loco
parentis, or a legal custodian other than a parent when granted specific authority in a custody
order to consent to medical or psychiatric treatment, without the permission of the minor,
concerning the medical health services set out in G.S. 90-21.5(a), unless the situation in the
opinion of the attending physician indicates that notification is essential to the life or health of
the minor. If a parent, legal guardian[,] person standing in loco parentis, or a legal custodian other
than a parent when granted specific authority in a custody order to consent to medical or
psychiatric treatment contacts the physician concerning the treatment or medical services being
provided to the minor, the physician may give information."
SECTION 2. G.S. 90-21.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-21.5. Minor's consent sufficient for certain medical health services.
(a) Subject to subsection (a1) of this section, any Any minor may give effective consent
to a physician licensed to practice medicine in North Carolina for medical health services for the
prevention, diagnosis and treatment of (i) venereal disease and other diseases reportable under
G.S. 130A-135, (ii) pregnancy, (iii) abuse of controlled substances or alcohol, and (iv) emotional
disturbance. pregnancy. This section does not authorize the inducing of an abortion, performance
of a sterilization operation, or admission to a 24-hour facility licensed under Article 2 of Chapter
122C of the General Statutes except as provided in G.S. 122C-223. This section does not prohibit
the admission of a minor to a treatment facility upon his own written application in an emergency
situation as authorized by G.S. 122C-223.
(a1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a health care provider
shall obtain written consent from a parent or legal guardian prior to administering any vaccine
*S759-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
that has been granted emergency use authorization and is not yet fully approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration to an individual under 18 years of age.
(b) Any minor who is emancipated may consent to any medical treatment, dental
services, and health services for himself that minor or for his that minor's child."
SECTION 3. Article 1A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
two new sections to read:
"§ 90-21.5A. Limited exception for examination without parental consent in cases of
suspected abuse or neglect.
(a) A health care practitioner may conduct or continue an examination of a minor without
first obtaining written or documented consent from a parent if the health care practitioner has a
reasonable belief that the examination will reveal information triggering an obligation to report
under G.S. 7B-301.
(b) A physician may conduct or continue an examination of a minor without first
obtaining written or documented consent from a parent if the physician has a reasonable belief
that the examination will reveal information triggering an obligation to report under
G.S. 90-21.20(c1).
"§ 90-21.5B. Parental access to minors' medical records.
(a) Parents have the right to access and review all medical records of their minor child,
including medical records of care for which the minor may give effective consent under
G.S. 90-21.5(a).
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, parents do not have the right to access
and review the medical records of their minor child if any of the following apply:
(1) The medical records are of health care described in G.S. 90-21.5A.
(2) The release of the medical records is prohibited by a valid court order.
(3) The parent is the subject of an investigation for a crime committed against the
minor child and a law enforcement agency or official has requested that the
medical records not be released."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to acts
occurring on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 759-First Edition